Hawaii statutes.
§664-32 Jurisdiction. The circuit
courts shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine, without the intervention
of a jury, all controversies respecting rights of private way and water rights,
as in this part provided. [L 1886, c 69, §2; am L 1888, c 26, §2; am L 1907, c
56, §2; RL 1925, §2937; RL 1935, §3678; RL 1945, §10219; RL 1955, §234-31; HRS
§664-32; am L 1972, c 90, §6(m)]

Case Notes

Jurisdiction not exclusive as to water rights. 10 H. 476
(1896); 19 H. 106 (1908); 32 H. 404 (1932), aff'd 52 F.2d 356 (1931).

Cited: 19 H. 106, 117 (1908).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next